Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1110
Question submitted to voters; form; effective date of plan.

(1) After publication pursuant to section 16-1109, each city council shall submit the question as proposed in the merger plan to the registered voters of the city as provided in section 16-1108.

(2) The question shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following form:

"Shall (name of city in which ballot will be voted) merge with (name of other city or cities) according to the merger plan previously adopted by the city councils in such cities? Yes No".

(3) The election shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Act. The election commissioner or county clerk shall certify the results to each city council involved in the plan.

(4) If a majority of the voters of each city voting on the question vote in favor of the merger plan, the plan shall become effective at the first regular meeting of the city council in December following the election, and the terms of the incumbents in the offices involved in the plan shall be deemed to end on that day.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 10.

Election Act, see section 32-101.